src/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON Obj_Adp
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u:ii      FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;   ! ií
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku:igu     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! igú
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka:iga     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! igá
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/la:ila     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! ilá

i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Neg/ma:ima     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! imá

ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u:kuu     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! kuú
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku:kugu   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! kugú
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka:kaa    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! kaá
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/la:kula   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;  ! kulá

ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u:noo     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; ! noóma
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku:nagu   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; ! nagúma
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka:naga   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; ! nagáma
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/la:nala   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; ! naláma

! inoó
! inagú
! inagá
! inalá

idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u:idiin    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;         ! idiín
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku:idinku   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;        ! idinkú
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka:idinka   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;        ! etc
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/la:idinla   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

! TODO: Check analysis, 3Sg Obj?
la+Pron+Impers+Subj+Adp/u:loo     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;           ! loó
la+Pron+Impers+Subj+Adp/ku:lagu   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;           ! lagú
la+Pron+Impers+Subj+Adp/ka:laga    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;          ! lagá
la+Pron+Impers+Subj+Adp/la:lala   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;           ! lalá

! And pronouns can join these preposition clusters

! TODO: read orwin p. 179

!           +ugú        +ugá        +ulá        +kagá       +kulá       +kalá
! i         iigú        iigá        iilá        igagá       igulá       igalá
! ku        kuugú       kaagá       kuulá       kaagá       kugulá      kaalá
! na        noogú       noogá       noolá       nagagá      nagulá      nagalá
! ina       inoogú      inoogá      inoolá      inagagá     inagulá     inagalá
! idin      idiinkú     idiinká     idiinla     idinkagá    idinkulá    idinkalá

! TODO:
!           +ugú        +ugá        +ulá        +kagá       +kulá       +kalá
! la        loogú       loogá       loolá       loogagá     loogulá     loogalá

! See testing/conj_preposition.txt for all of the above.

! Note, using pronominal absolutive forms in the lemma... 
! TODO: finish these


LEXICON Adp_Adp
u+Adp+Adp/u:ugu     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

u+Adp+Adp/gu:ugu     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

ku+Adp+Adp/ku:kaga    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

u+Adp+Adp/ka:uga     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Adp+Adp/ku:kaga    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Adp+Adp/ka:kaga    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ka+Adp+Adp/ka:kaga    FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

u+Adp+Adp/la:ula     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Adp+Adp/la:kula   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ka+Adp+Adp/la:kala   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;

LEXICON PP_Misc
is+Adp+Refl+Adp/ka:iska     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
is+Adp+Refl+Adp/la:isla     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
is+Adp+Refl+Adp/ku:isku     FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
is+Adp+Refl:is      FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;





! Obj + Adp_Adp work, but no phonological things have been implemented yet.

! These are the indeclinable ones 
! LEXICON PP 
! +Po:0 #; 

! 
! PP ; !Dummy entry

LEXICON Separative
wada+PP+Com:wada        PP_FINAL "together" ;
kala+PP+Sep:kala        PP_FINAL "apart" ;

LEXICON Deictics 
soo+PP+Deic:soo     PP_FINAL ;
sii+PP+Deic:sii     PP_FINAL ;

! 
LEXICON Gen_Postp
aawadeed+PostP:aawadeed Clitics "For the sake of, because of X" ;


LEXICON FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG
:´              PP_FINAL ;
+Neg/ma:ma´´                PP_FINAL ;

! 
LEXICON PP_FINAL
 FINAL ;
!  CmpNGVerb ;


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :

LEXICON Obj_Adp_Adp
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:iigu                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:iiga                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:iila                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:igaga               FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:igula               FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
i+Pron+Pers+1Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:igala               FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:kuugu                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:kaaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:kuula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:kaaga               FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:kugula              FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ku+Pron+Pers+2Sg+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:kaala               FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:noogu                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:nooga                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:noola                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:nagaga                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:nagula                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
na+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Excl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:nagala                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:inoogu                   FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:inooga                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:inoola                  FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:inagaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:inagula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
ina+Pron+Pers+1Pl+Incl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:inagala                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/u:idiinku                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:idiinka                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/u+Adp/la:idiinla                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:idinkaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:idinkula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
idinka+Pron+Pers+2Pl+Sem/Obj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:idinkala                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/u:loogu                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/ka:looga                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/u+Adp/la:loola                 FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:loogaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ku+Adp/la:loogula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+Subj+Adp/ka+Adp/la:loogala                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ; 
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u:la%-ii                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ku:laygu                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ka:layga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/la:layla                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/u:laiigu                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/ka:laiiga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/u+Adp/la:laiila                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:laygaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ku+Adp/la:laygula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+1SgObj/i+Adp/ga+Adp/la:laygala                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u:laguu                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ku:lagugu                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ka:lagaa                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/la:lagula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/u:laguugu                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/ka:lagaaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/u+Adp/la:laguula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ka+Adp/ka:lagaaga                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ku+Adp/la:lagugula                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
la+Pron+Pers+Impers+2SgObj/ku+Adp/ga+Adp/la:lagaala                FINAL_TONE_OR_NEG ;
